Utah statutes.
53B-12-107.   Annual report -- Annual audit -- Reimbursement of state auditor.

(1)  Following the close of each fiscal year, the authority submits an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the governor and the Legislature.

(2)  Each report shall include a complete operating and financial statement of the authority during the fiscal year it covers.

(3)  The state auditor shall at least once in each year audit the books and accounts of the authority or contract with an independent certified public accountant for this audit.

(4)  The authority shall reimburse the state auditor from its available money for the actual and necessary costs of the audit.

